Massachusetts, session 194th, H907.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 65 of the acts of 2010 is hereby amended by inserting
at the end of the first paragraph the following:- The survey of the parcel shall include navigable
channels and berthing/mooring areas on the water sheet. The survey shall establish a schedule for
maintenance of navigable waters from each boating facility.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of said chapter 65, is hereby amended by inserting after the first
sentence the following:- The Commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance and
the commissioner of conservation and recreation shall manage, operate, improve, repair and
maintain the land under water for the term of the lease for: (a) recreational boating waterside
access, (b) the protection of navigable waterways and channels.
SECTION 3. Said section 2 of said chapter 65 is hereby further amended by inserting
after the words “yacht and boating facilities identified in section 1” the following:- ; provided
of 2

however, the lessee has adequate access to navigable waters for recreational boating and
mooring, and there exists the capacity for water dependent uses.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2